Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation on  ex-
penditures established by section 11 (1), chapter 616, Oregon Laws 2025, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2027, as the maximum limit for  payment of expenses from lottery moneys
allocated from the Administrative Services Economic Development Fund to the Oregon
Business Development Department, for operations, is increased by $235,846, for implementa-
tion of section 2 of this 2026 Act.
SECTION 1a.
Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the  limitation on ex-
penditures established by section 11 (2), chapter 616, Oregon Laws 2025, for the  biennium
ending June 30, 2027, as the maximum  limit for payment of expenses from lottery moneys
allocated from the Administrative Services Economic Development Fund to the Oregon
Business Development Department, for business, innovation and trade, is  increased by
$950,000, for micro-enterprise tariff adjustment grants under section 2 of this 2026 Act.
SECTION 2.
(1) The Oregon Business Development Department shall establish a  program
to award micro-enterprise tariff adjustment grants to small businesses  to cover significant
increases in business costs due to tariffs recently imposed by the federal government.
(2) A business is eligible for a grant if:
(a) The business’s headquarters or principal operations are in Oregon;
(b) As of the date on which an application  is filed pursuant to this section, the business
has been operating for at least two years;
(c) The business has annual sales of not more than $500,000; and
(d) The business can demonstrate a significant increase  in business costs due to tariffs
recently imposed by the federal government.
(3)(a) The department shall adopt rules to establish an application process,  including but
not limited to:
(A) An application form;
(B) Information and documentation to be included with the application to establish  the
business’s eligibility for a grant;
(C) Deadlines; and
(D) Any other provisions the department considers necessary or useful to the  application
process or the conduct of the grant program.
Enrolled House Bill 4061 (HB 4061-B) Page 1
(b) A grant may be awarded in an amount not to exceed $10,000 for any  business whose
application is approved.
(c) The rejection of a grant application may not be appealed, but an eligible business  may
reapply for a grant at any time.
SECTION 3. Section 2 of this 2026 Act is repealed on January 2, 2029.
SECTION 4. The Oregon Business Development Department, in collaboration with the
Port of Portland, the Oregon Tourism Commission, the State Department of Agriculture and
other stakeholders selected by the  Oregon Business Development Department, shall update
the unified trade strategy for Oregon, including, but not limited to:
(1) Identifying opportunities to  increase Oregon’s presence in foreign markets, including
in-market capacity for emerging markets;
(2) Supporting outbound and inbound trade missions for government and businesses, in-
cluding support with aligned messaging;
(3) Promoting Oregon exports and attracting foreign direct investments in Oregon; and
(4) Providing technical  assistance to Oregon exporters, including those impacted by
tariffs, to support international market access and business expansion.
SECTION 5.
This 2026 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency  is declared to exist, and this 2026 Act takes effect
on its passage.
Passed by House March 3, 2026
..................................................................................
Timothy G. Sekerak, Chief Clerk of House
..................................................................................
Julie Fahey, Speaker of House
Passed by Senate March 6, 2026
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2026
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2026
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2026
..................................................................................
Tobias Read, Secretary of State
Enrolled House Bill 4061 (HB 4061-B) Page 2